Utah statutes.
23-20-1.5.   Powers of law enforcement section -- Employees.

(1)  The chief and assistant chief of the law enforcement section, enforcement agents, and conservation officers of the law enforcement section within the Division of Wildlife Resources are vested with the powers of law enforcement officers throughout all of the counties of the state with exception of the power to serve civil process and:

(a)  may serve criminal process, arrest, and prosecute violators of any law of this state; and

(b)  shall have the same right as other law enforcement officers to require aid in executing their duties.

(2)  The powers and duties conferred by this section upon employees of the law enforcement section of the Division of Wildlife Resources shall be supplementary to and in no way a limitation on the powers and duties of other law enforcement officers in the state.

